Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-617.07
Refusal to issue delayed birth certificate; reasons; appeal.

If an applicant for a certificate of delayed birth registration fails to submit the minimum documentation required for the delayed registration or if the department has reasonable cause to question the validity or adequacy of either the applicant's sworn statement or the documentary evidence due to conflicting evidence submitted and if the deficiencies are not corrected, the department shall not issue and register a delayed certificate of birth and shall advise the applicant of the reasons for such action. The department shall further advise the applicant of his or her right of appeal to the department and then, if not satisfied, to the county court as provided in section 71-617.08.

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 531;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 146;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 421.